Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 2
ORGANIZATION

28-3-201. Composition.

The Colorado National Guard consists of the regularly enlisted militia within the ages prescribed by federal law and regulations, organized, armed, and equipped as provided in this article 3, and of commissioned officers and warrant officers within the ages and having the qualifications prescribed by federal law and regulations. "National Guard" applies only to militia organized as provided for in this article 3 and authorized by federal law and regulations relating to the National Guard. The number of officers and enlisted personnel of the National Guard must be fixed from time to time and organized so as to meet the requirements of the federal laws and regulations. The Colorado National Guard is a

type 2

entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 614, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-7.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3417, § 187, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

28-3-202. Organization of inactive guard.

The inactive National Guard shall be organized and maintained under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed in accordance with federal law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 614, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-8.

28-3-203. Organization of National Guard.

The organization of the National Guard, including the composition of all units thereof, shall be such as is or may be prescribed for this state by federal law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 614, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-9.

28-3-204. Call to federal duty - status.

When congress has declared a national emergency or has authorized the use of the armed forces of the United States for any purpose requiring the use of troops in excess of those in the regular armed services and the president has ordered into the active military service of the United States, to serve therein for the period of the war or emergency, any units and members of the National Guard of this state, all forces so ordered into the active military service of the United States shall from the date thereof stand relieved from duty in the National Guard of this state so long as they remain in the active military service of the United States when so provided by the federal law. Upon being relieved from such duty in the military service of the United States, all such individuals and units shall revert to their Colorado National Guard status.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 614, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-10.